New Jersey, session 222, S1443.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The Office of Public Integrity and Accountability in the Department of Law and Public Safety shall adopt, implement, and comply with guidelines that are consistent with the most recent Internal Affairs Policy and Procedures promulgated by the Office of the Attorney General. b.    The Office of Public Integrity and Accountability shall submit a report to the Legislature pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), for each investigation conducted by the office that is not completed within 180 days.  The report shall summarize all actions taken by the office during the investigation. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.